Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 5 Licenses Generally
3-5-28.
Uniform procedures.

The department is authorized to issue any orders and prescribe any forms to local licensing boards or authorities that will provide uniform procedures and forms in the processing, handling and reporting of license applications and disciplinary actions against licensees by local licensing boards or authorities.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

3-5-28

; P.L. 1965, ch. 109, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 7.

3-5-29.
Prohibition against assignment or leasing of license.

The holder of a license issued pursuant to this title shall not assign, rent, lease or let the license but may transfer his or her interest only as provided in §

3-5-19

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

3-5-29

; P.L. 1968, ch. 80, § 1.